Utah statutes.
32B-6-408.   Information obtained by investigator.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), if an investigator is permitted by another provision of this title to inspect a record of a club licensee, in addition to any other rights under this title, the investigator may inspect, have a copy of, or otherwise review any record of the club licensee that is a visual recording of the operations of the club licensee.

(2)  An investigator who is a peace officer may not inspect, have a copy of, or otherwise review a visual recording described in Subsection (1) without probable cause.

